California, session 20252026, AB1227.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21080.06 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.06. (a) Without limiting any other statutory or categorical exemption provided under this division and subject to subdivision (b), this division does not apply to a critical fuels reduction project conducted in a community located in a very high fire hazard severity zone as identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4202 or as designated by an ordinance pursuant to Section 51179 of the Government Code that does at least one of the following:(1) Removes hazardous, dead, or dying trees.(2) Removes vegetation for the creation of strategic fuel breaks as identified by approved fire prevention plans, including CAL FIRE Unit Fire Plans or Community Wildfire Protection Plans.(3) Removes vegetation along roadways, highways, and freeways for the creation of safer ingress and egress routes for the public and responders and to reduce roadside ignitions.(4) Removes vegetation using cultural traditional ecological knowledge for cultural burning or prescribed fire treatments or both of those types of treatments for fuels reduction projects.(5) Maintains previously established fuel breaks or fuel modification projects.(b) For purposes of paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, and (3), subdivision (a) only applies if the vegetation removed for the critical fuels reduction project meets all of the following requirements:(1) The vegetation is a nonnative species.(2) The vegetation is eight inches or less in diameter.(3) The vegetation is a common species.(c) Before determining that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, the lead agency shall hold a noticed public meeting on the project to hear and respond to public comments. The lead agency shall provide notice of the public meeting on its internet website at least 30 days before the public meeting.(d) If the lead agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and the lead agency determines to approve or carry out that project, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and the county clerk in the county in which the project is located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.(c)(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. On or before January 31, 2026, the Natural Resources Agency and the California Environmental Protection Agency shall, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, each report to the Legislature on the implementation of the proclamation of a state of emergency issued by Governor Gavin Newsom on March 1, 2025, that suspends applicable state statutes, rules, regulations, and requirements that fall within the jurisdiction of boards, departments, and offices within the California Environmental Protection Agency or the Natural Resources Agency to the extent necessary for expediting critical fuels reduction projects. The report from each of those agencies shall contain all of the following information:(a) A list of all entities that requested the secretary of the reporting agency to make a determination that the requested activity is eligible for the suspension as a critical fuels reduction project under the proclamation.(b) A list of all entities that used the suspension provided under the proclamation by either reporting agency or both reporting agencies after the reporting agency made the determination on eligibility for the suspension.(c) Detailed information on the projects of each entity for which the suspension was provided, including location, treatment, and acreage.(d) Information on how the project for which suspension was provided advances the state’s wildfire mitigation and forest health treatment goals.(e) Information about instances in which any project for which suspension was provided failed to comply with the 2020 Statewide Fires–Environmental Protection Plan and to what extent the noncompliance is known.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.